Hawaii, session 2026, GM1356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that, as the cost of
living continues to increase in the State, it is necessary for
the State to intervene in markets where retailers and goods and
services providers are treating consumers unfairly. The ability
to identify the price of a good or service is a necessity for a
properly functioning economy. Consumers look for prices to
comparison shop and to weigh what a good or service might be
worth. Most consumers rely on price information to answer
critical questions around how much they are able to spend and
save, and how they will meet their basic needs and those of
their families.
The legislature also finds that consumers increasingly face
widespread and growing unfair and deceptive fee practices that
make it harder to identify how much something will ultimately
cost. Unfortunately, the Internet and the ability to purchase
goods or services online have only exacerbated the practice of
charging mandatory junk fees that are not disclosed until after
2026-2405 SB2031 CDl SMA.docx

S.B NO.
h.D. 1
C.D. 1
the transaction begins. The practice of charging junk fees and
other undisclosed mandatory costs is called drip pricing. Drip
pricing is most prevalent in practices involving fees for live-
event tickets and short-term lodging and other temporary
sleeping accommodations, such as hotels, motels, inns, short­
term rentals, and vacation rentals.
The legislature further finds that according to the Federal
Trade Commission, in the last few years alone, tens of thousands
of Americans have expressed displeasure upon discovering the
cost of their hotel stays were significantly higher than
expected due to hidden resort fees and other mandatory charges
in addition to the advertised price. Consumers have also
complained about purchasing tickets to a live-event online and
finding out that the quoted ticket price had almost doubled by
the time they reached the final checkout page. Consumers have
confronted a host of mysterious, mandatory charges labeled as
"convenience", "processing", or "service" fees that are
nondescriptive and confusing. These practices are frustrating
for consumers when they shop for travel and entertainment,
especially because these purchases can represent significant
expenditures to their already strained finances.
2026-2405 SB2031 CDl SMA.docx
Mwinniiiininiiiii

Page 3 S.B. NO.
-’2
C.D. 1
The Legislature additionally finds that the Federal Trade
Commission issued a final rule on January 10, 2025, to address
certain unfair or deceptive practices involving fees or charges
for live-event tickets and short-term lodging. This final rule
serves as a guidance for the State to enhance its consumer
protection laws and allow consumers to make better informed
decisions when purchasing live-event tickets or deciding where
to stay on a short-term basis by leveling the playing field for
honest businesses in these industries that truthfully and
transparently disclose their pricing information.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to make it an
unfair or deceptive act or practice for businesses to:
(1) Offer, display, or advertise the price of live-event
tickets or short-term lodging without clearly and
conspicuously disclosing the total price more
prominently than other pricing information, except the
final amount of payment; and
(2) Misrepresent any fees or charges in any offer,
display, or advertisement for the sale of live-event
tickets or short-term lodging.
2026-2405 SB2031 GDI SMA.docx

Page 4
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Chapter 481B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§481B- Live-event tickets; short-term lodgings; total
price; disclosure required; prohibited. (a) It shall be an
unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of section
480-2 and a violation of this part for any business to
advertise, display, or offer any price of a covered good or
service without clearly and conspicuously disclosing the total
price.
(b) In any advertisement, display, or offer that
represents the price of a covered good or service, a business
shall disclose the total price more prominently than any other
pricing information; provided that when the final amount of
payment for the transaction is displayed, the final amount of
payment shall be disclosed more prominently than, or as
prominently as, the total price.
(c) A business shall clearly and conspicuously disclose,
before the consumer consents to pay for any covered good or
service:
2026-2405 SB2031 GDI SMA.docx

Page 5 S.B. NO. 2031
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) The nature, purpose, and amount of any fee or charge
imposed on the transaction that has been excluded from
the total price and the identity of the good or
service for which the fee or charge is imposed; and
(2) The final amount of payment for the transaction.
(d) In any advertisement, display, or offer for a covered
good or service, it shall be an unfair or deceptive act or
practice in violation of section 480-2 and a violation of this
part for any business to misrepresent any fee or charge,
including but not limited to;
(1) The nature, purpose, amount, or refundability of any
fee or charge; and
(2) The identity of the good or service for which the fee
or charge is imposed.
(e) Any advertisement, display, or offer of short-term
lodging or live-event tickets that complies with the provisions
of title 16 Code of Federal Regulations part 464 shall be deemed
compliant with this section.
(f) For the purposes of this section;
"Ancillary good or service” means any additional goods or
services offered to a consumer as part of the same transaction.
2026-2405 SB2031 CDl SMA.docx
iiiBniiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiii

Page 6 S.B. NO.
“0’2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
2BusijTe£s 2 ineans a^erson that off^rs coyered 2oods or
services, including but not limited to online, in mobile
applications, or at physical locations.
"Clearly and conspicuously” means a required disclosure
that is easily noticeable (i.e., difficult to miss) and easily
understandable by ordinary consumers, including in all of the
following ways:
(1) In any communication that is solely visual or solely
audible, the disclosure shall be made through the same
means through which the communication is presented.
In any communication made through both visual and
audible means, such as a television advertisement, the
disclosure shall be presented simultaneously in both
the visual and audible portions of the communication
even if the communication requiring the disclosure is
made in only one means;
(2) A visual disclosure, by its size, contrast, or
location, the length of time it appears, and other
characteristics, shall stand out from any accompanying
text or other visual elements so that the visual
disclosure is easily noticed, read, and understood;
2026-2405 SB2031 CDl SMA.docx 6
iiiiiiiiiiiniiiHiiwiiiii

Page 7 S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(3) An audible disclosure, including by telephone or
streaming video, shall be delivered in a volume,
speed, and cadence sufficient for ordinary consumers
to easily hear and understand the audible disclosure;
(4) In any communication using an interactive electronic
medium, such as the Internet, a mobile application, or
software, the disclosure shall be unavoidable;
The disclosure shall use diction and syntax
understandable to ordinary consumers and shall appear
in each language in which the representation that
requires the disclosure appears;
(6) The disclosure shall comply with these requirements in
each medium through which the disclosure is received,
including all electronic devices and face-to-face
IS communications;
(7) The disclosure shall not be contradicted or mitigated
by, or inconsistent with, anything else in the
communication; and
(8) When the representation or sales practice targets a
specific audience, such as children, older adults, or
2026-2405 SB2031 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiiiniiniiiiHiiiiiii

Page 8 S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
the terminally ill, members of that group shall be
considered ordinary consumers.
’’Covered good or service" means:
(1) Live-event tickets; or
(2) Short-term lodging, including temporary sleeping
accommodations at a hotel, motel, inn, short-term
rental, vacation rental, or other place of lodging.
"Government charges" means the fees or charges imposed on
the transaction by a federal, state, tribal, or local government
agency, department, or unit.
"Pricing information" means any information relating to an
amount that a consumer may pay.
"Shipping charges" means the fees or charges that
reasonably reflect the amount a business incurs to send physical
goods to a consumer, including through the United States Postal
Service, private mail and shipping services, or by freight.
"Total price"' means the maximum total of all fees or
charges that a consumer shall pay for any good or service and
any mandatory ancillary good or service; provided that
government charges, shipping charges, and fees or charges for
any optional ancillary good or service may be excluded."
2026-2405 SB2031 GDI SMA.docx 8
miiiHHHiiiiimniwH

Page 9 S.B. NO. 2031
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2405 SB2031 CDl SMA.docx 9
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiinMiiiin

S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2031, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
38-26

SB No. 2031, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives